California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 24.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27415.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement
 Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 25.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Crimes Relating to Sale, Lease, or Transfer of Firearms [27500. - 28000.]



  ARTICLE 1. Crimes Relating to Sale, Lease, or Transfer of Firearms [27500. - 27595.1.]

27500.

(a) No person, corporation, or firm shall knowingly sell, supply, deliver, or give possession or control of a firearm to any person within any of the classes prohibited by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9.

(b) No person, corporation, or dealer shall sell, supply, deliver, or give possession or control of a firearm to anyone whom the person, corporation, or dealer has cause to believe is within any of the classes prohibited by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of
 Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27505.

(a) No person, corporation, or firm shall sell, loan, or transfer a firearm to a minor, nor sell a handgun to an individual under 21 years of age.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to or affect the following circumstances:

(1) The sale of a handgun, if the handgun is an antique firearm and the sale is to a person at least 18 years of age.

(2) The loan of a firearm to a minor by the minor’s parent or legal guardian, if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(A) The minor is being loaned the firearm for the purposes of engaging in a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(B) The duration of the loan does not exceed the amount of time that is reasonably necessary to engage in the lawful, recreational sport,
 including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(3) The loan of a semiautomatic centerfire rifle or handgun to a minor by a person who is not the minor’s parent or legal guardian, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(A) The minor is accompanied by the minor’s parent or legal guardian when the
 loan is made, or the minor has the written consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian, which is presented at the time of the loan, or earlier.

(B) The minor is being loaned the firearm for the purpose of engaging in a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting
 activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(C) The duration of the loan does not exceed the amount of time that is reasonably necessary to engage in the lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(D) The duration of the loan does not, in any event, exceed 10 days.

(4) The loan of a firearm other than a semiautomatic centerfire rifle or a handgun to a minor who is 16 years of age or older, by a person who is not the minor’s parent or legal guardian, if all of the following conditions apply:

(A) The loan is with the express permission of the minor’s parent or legal guardian.

(B) The minor is being loaned the firearm for the purpose of engaging in a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(C) The duration of the loan does not exceed the amount of time that is reasonably necessary to engage in the lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(D) The duration of the loan does not, in any event, exceed 5 days, unless express permission is provided in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), in which case the duration of the loan shall not, in any event, exceed 10 days.

(5) The loan of a firearm other than a semiautomatic centerfire rifle or a handgun to a minor under 16 years of age by a person who is not the minor’s parent or legal guardian, if all of the following conditions apply:

(A) The loan is with the express permission of the minor’s parent or legal guardian.

(B) The minor is being loaned the firearm for the purpose of engaging in a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(C) The duration of the loan does not exceed the amount of time that is reasonably necessary to engage in the lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(D) The minor accompanied at all times by a responsible adult.

(E) The duration of the loan does not, in any event, exceed 5 days, unless express permission is provided in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), in which case the duration of the loan shall not, in any event,
 exceed 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 8.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

27510.

(a) A person licensed under Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, shall not sell, supply, deliver, or give possession or control of a firearm to any person who is under 21 years of age.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to or affect the sale, supplying, delivery, or giving possession or control of a firearm that is not a handgun, semiautomatic centerfire rifle, completed frame or receiver, or firearm precursor part to a person 18 years of age or older who possesses a valid, unexpired hunting license issued by the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(2) Subdivision (a) does not apply to or affect the sale, supplying,
 delivery, or giving possession or control of a firearm that is not a handgun or a semiautomatic centerfire rifle to a person who is 18 years of age or older and provides proper identification of being an honorably discharged member of the United States Armed Forces, the National Guard, the Air National Guard, or the active reserve components of the United States. For purposes of this subparagraph, proper identification includes an Armed Forces Identification Card or other written documentation certifying that the individual is an honorably discharged member

(3) Subdivision (a) does not apply to or affect the sale, supplying, delivery, or giving possession or control of a firearm that is not a handgun to any of the following persons who are 18 years of age or older:

(A) An
 active peace officer, as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of employment.

(B) An active federal officer or law enforcement agent who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of employment.

(C) A reserve peace officer, as defined in Section 832.6, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of employment as a reserve peace officer.

(D) A person who provides proper identification of active membership in the United States Armed Forces, the National Guard, the Air National Guard, or active reserve components of the United States. For purposes of this subparagraph, proper identification
 includes an Armed Forces Identification Card or other written documentation certifying that the individual is an active member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 16.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

27515.

No person, corporation, or dealer shall sell, loan, or transfer a firearm to anyone whom the person, corporation, or dealer knows or has cause to believe is not the actual purchaser or transferee of the firearm, or to anyone who is not the one actually being loaned the firearm, if the person, corporation, or dealer has either of the following:

(a) Knowledge that the firearm is to be subsequently sold, loaned, or transferred to avoid the provisions of Section 27540 or 27545.

(b) Knowledge that the firearm is to be subsequently sold, loaned, or transferred to avoid the requirements of any exemption to the provisions of Section
 27540 or 27545.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27520.

(a) A person, corporation, or dealer shall not acquire within this state or bring into this state a firearm for the purpose of selling, loaning, or transferring the firearm, if the person, corporation, or dealer has either of the following:

(1) In the case of a dealer, intent to violate Section 27510 or 27540.

(2) In any other case, intent to avoid either of the following:

(A) The provisions of Section 27545.

(B) The requirements of any exemption to the provisions of Section 27545.

(b) The provisions of this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of this code shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 543, Sec. 1.   (SB 758)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27525.

(a) A dealer shall comply with Section 26905.

(b) A dealer shall comply with Section 26910.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27530.

(a) No person shall sell or otherwise transfer ownership of a firearm that is not imprinted with a serial number imprinted by a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A firearm made or assembled prior to December 16, 1968, that is not a handgun.

(2) A firearm that is a curio or relic, or an antique firearm, as those terms are defined in Section 479.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A firearm that has been
 entered, before July 1, 2018, into the centralized registry set forth in Section 11106, as being owned by a specific individual or entity, if that firearm has assigned to it a distinguishing number or mark of identification because the department accepted entry of that firearm into the centralized registry.

(4) The transfer, surrender, or sale of a firearm to a law enforcement agency.

(5) The sale or transfer of ownership of a firearm to a federally licensed firearms manufacturer or importer, or any other federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 17.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

27531.

The following terms have the following meanings for purposes of this article:

(a) “Microstamp” means a microscopic array of characters that may be used to identify the specific serial number of a firearm from spent cartridge casings discharged by that firearm.

(b) “Microstamping component” means a firing pin or other component part of a semiautomatic pistol that, when installed, produces a microstamp on at least one location of the expended cartridge case each time the pistol is fired.

(c) “Microstamping-enabled” means either of the following:

(1) The firearm’s manufacturer has certified in writing that the firearm contains a microstamping component that meets the performance standards established by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27532.

(2) A licensed firearms dealer or gunsmith has certified in writing that they serviced the firearm to install a microstamping component that meets the performance standards established by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27532.

(d) “Producing microstamping components” may include, but is not limited to, the process of engraving a firing pin to modify the pin into a microstamping component.

(e) “Semiautomatic pistol” means a pistol, as defined in Section 16530, that has an operating mode that uses the energy of the explosive in a fixed cartridge to extract a fired cartridge and chamber a fresh cartridge with each single pull or activation of the trigger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   (SB 452)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27532.

(a) On or before March 1, 2025, the Department of Justice shall engage in an investigation to determine the technological viability of microstamping components producing microstamps on spent cartridge casings discharged by a firearm into which the microstamping component has been installed. The investigation shall include input from relevant stakeholders.

(b) If the department has determined that microstamping components are technologically viable pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall, on or before September 1, 2025, provide written guidance on performance standards
 for persons, associations, partnerships, corporations, or other entities engaged in the business of producing microstamping components, which shall include processes and standards for those entities to demonstrate that a representative sample of the microstamping components they manufacture produce legible microstamps with reasonable reliability, including after repeated firing.

(c) If the department has determined that microstamping components are technologically viable pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall, on or before January 1, 2026, commence accepting applications for licensure of persons, associations, partnerships, corporations, or other entities to engage in the business of producing microstamping components that meet those performance standards. A federally licensed firearms manufacturer shall not be required to
 obtain a license in order to manufacture
 microstamping components but shall comply with Section 27535 if it provides a certification that a firearm is microstamping-enabled.

(d) If the department has determined that microstamping components are technologically viable pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall, on or before July 1, 2026, provide grants or enter into contracts with one or more entities licensed pursuant to subdivision (c) to produce microstamping components that meet the performance standards identified in subdivision (b) and to make those microstamping components available for sale or other distribution at a reasonable cost to firearm manufacturers, licensed firearms dealers, and gunsmiths engaged in the business of installing microstamping components in the State of California in accordance with this section.

(e) If the department has determined that microstamping components are technologically viable pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall, on or before July 1, 2027, determine if either, or both, of the following are true:

(1) Microstamping components at commercially reasonable prices are available from licensees operating pursuant to subdivision (c) or subdivision (d).

(2) Options of microstamping-enabled firearms are
 readily available for purchase in the State of California.

(f) Upon a determination that microstamping components are available pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) or that microstamping-enabled firearms are available pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), the department shall make publicly available a list of all licensees producing microstamping components meeting the performance standards established in subdivision (b) and shall notify licensed firearms dealers, gunsmiths, and manufacturers operating within the State of California of the list of available microstamping component producers. The department shall update its determination and the list of licensees producing microstamping components annually thereafter.

(g) The department shall adopt rules or regulations that may be necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this section, including the adoption of fees for the licensure of a person or an entity as described in subdivision (c). Regulations adopted pursuant to this section are exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 253, Sec. 2.   (SB 452)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27533.

(a) Commencing on January 1, 2028, if the department has determined that microstamping components, microstamping-enabled semi-automatic firearms, or both microstamping components and microstamping-enabled firearms are available pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 27532, it shall be unlawful for a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, to sell, offer for sale, exchange, give, transfer, or deliver any semiautomatic pistol unless the pistol has been certified as a microstamping-enabled pistol as defined in Section 27531. A dealer shall be in compliance with this section if the dealer relies in good faith on a written certification made by the pistol’s manufacturer that the pistol is
 microstamping-enabled, on a written certification made by a gunsmith that serviced the pistol to install a microstamping component, or if the dealer has serviced the pistol to install a microstamping component certified by an entity licensed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 27532.

(b) The first violation for unlawful sale of a nonmicrostamping-enabled pistol pursuant to this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) The second violation for unlawful sale of a nonmicrostamping-enabled pistol pursuant to this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and may result in the revocation of the dealer’s license issued under Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(d) The third violation for unlawful sale of a nonmicrostamping-enabled pistol pursuant to this section is a misdemeanor and shall result in the revocation of the dealer’s license issued under Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(e) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A pistol manufactured or delivered to a firearms dealer prior to January 1, 2028.

(2) A transaction conducted through a licensed firearms dealer pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050) of this division.

(3) The sale, offer for sale, exchange, giving, transfer, or delivery of a semiautomatic
 pistol to a gunsmith or other qualified entity for the purposes of service or repair, including for installation of a microstamping component, or to any other person, firm, corporation, or other entity that holds a valid federal firearms license issued pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   (SB 452)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27534.

(a) A person who modifies a microstamping-enabled pistol or microstamping component with the intent to prevent the production of a microstamp is, for a first offense, guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, and for a second or subsequent offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail of not more than one year, by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a pistol manufactured prior to
 the effective date of this section.

(c) For the purposes of this section, it shall not be unlawful to replace the microstamping component of a microstamping-enabled pistol when the component is damaged or in need of replacement with another valid microstamping component for the safe use of the firearm or replacing a microstamping component for a legitimate sporting purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 253, Sec. 4.   (SB 452)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27534.1.

(a) It shall be unlawful to knowingly or recklessly provide a false or misleading certification that a firearm is microstamping-enabled, as defined in Section 27531.

(b) If a court determines that any person or entity has violated this section, the court may award either or both of the following:

(1) Civil penalties in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each firearm in violation.

(2) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the person or entity from further violations of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 253, Sec. 5.   (SB 452)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27534.2.

The Department of Justice is authorized to adopt regulations to implement Sections 27533, 27534, 27534.1, and 31910. Regulations adopted pursuant to those sections are exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 253, Sec. 6.   (SB 452)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27535.

(a) A person shall not make an application to purchase more than one firearm within any 30-day period. This subdivision does not authorize a person to make an application to purchase a combination of firearms, completed frames or receivers, or firearm precursor parts within the same 30-day period.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any law enforcement agency.

(2) Any agency duly authorized to perform law enforcement duties.

(3) Any state or local correctional facility.

(4) Any
 private security company licensed to do business in California.

(5) Any person who is properly identified as a full-time paid peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, and who is authorized to, and does carry a firearm during the course and scope of employment as a peace officer.

(6) Any motion picture, television, or video production company or entertainment or theatrical company whose production by its nature involves the use of a firearm.

(7) Any person who may, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 27600), Article 3 (commencing with Section 27650), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 27700), claim an exemption from the waiting period set forth in Section 27540.

(8) Any private party
 transaction where the seller is, at the time of the transaction, required under state law or by court order to relinquish all firearms.

(9) Any private party transaction where the seller is any of the following:

(A) The personal representative of a decedent’s estate who is transferring the firearms to one or more heirs or beneficiaries of the decedent’s estate pursuant to the decedent’s will or the laws of intestate succession.

(B) The holder of the decedent’s property who is transferring the firearms pursuant to Section 13101 of the Probate Code to the successor of the decedent, as defined in Section 13006 of the Probate Code, or to the surviving spouse of the decedent pursuant to Section 13500 of the Probate Code.

(C) The trustee of a trust who is
 transferring the firearms to one or more trust beneficiaries upon the death of a settlor of the trust.

(10) Any person who is licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, and has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) of Chapter 2.

(11) The exchange of a firearm where the dealer purchased that firearm from the person seeking the exchange within the 30-day period immediately preceding the date of exchange or replacement.

(12) The replacement of a firearm if the person’s firearm was lost or stolen, and the person reported that firearm lost or stolen pursuant to Section 25250 prior to the completion of the application to
 purchase the replacement.

(13) The return of any firearm to its owner.

(14) A community college that is certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training to present the law enforcement academy basic course or other commission-certified law enforcement training.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 15.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 16 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

27535.

(a) A person shall not make an application to purchase one or more firearms that would result in the purchase of more than three firearms cumulatively within any 30-day period. This subdivision does not authorize a person to make an application or applications to purchase a combination of firearms, completed frames or receivers, or firearm precursor parts within the same 30-day period.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any law enforcement agency.

(2) Any agency duly authorized to perform law enforcement duties.

(3) Any
 state or local correctional facility.

(4) Any private security company licensed to do business in California.

(5) Any person who is properly identified as a full-time paid peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, and who is authorized to, and does carry a firearm during the course and scope of employment as a peace officer.

(6) Any motion picture, television, or video production company or entertainment or theatrical company whose production by its nature involves the use of a firearm.

(7) Any person who may, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 27600), Article 3 (commencing with Section 27650), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 27700), claim an exemption from the waiting period set forth
 in Section 27540.

(8) Any private party transaction where the seller is, at the time of the transaction, required under state law or by court order to relinquish all firearms.

(9) Any private party transaction where the seller is any of the following:

(A) The personal representative of a decedent’s estate who is transferring the firearms to one or more heirs or beneficiaries of the decedent’s estate pursuant to the decedent’s will or the laws of intestate succession.

(B) The holder of the decedent’s property who is transferring the firearms pursuant to Section 13101 of the Probate Code to the successor of the decedent, as defined in Section 13006 of the Probate Code, or to the surviving spouse of the decedent pursuant to Section 13500 of the Probate
 Code.

(C) The trustee of a trust who is transferring the firearms to one or more trust beneficiaries upon the death of a settlor of the trust.

(10) Any person who is licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, and has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) of Chapter 2.

(11) The exchange of a firearm where the dealer purchased that firearm from the person seeking the exchange within the 30-day period immediately preceding the date of exchange or replacement.

(12) The replacement of a firearm if the person’s firearm was lost or stolen, and the person
 reported that firearm lost or stolen pursuant to Section 25250 prior to the completion of the application to purchase the replacement.

(13) The return of any firearm to its owner.

(14) A community college that is certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training to present the law enforcement academy basic course or other commission-certified law enforcement training.

(c) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 16.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27540.

A dealer, whether or not acting pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), shall not deliver a firearm to a person, as follows:

(a) Within 10 days of the application to purchase, or, after notice by the department pursuant to Section 28220, within 10 days of the submission to the department of any correction to the application, or within 10 days of the submission to the department of any fee required pursuant to Section 28225, whichever is later.

(b) Unless unloaded and securely wrapped or unloaded and in a locked container.

(c) Unless the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm presents clear evidence of the person’s identity
 and age to the dealer.

(d) Whenever the dealer is notified by the Department of Justice that the person is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(e) A firearm, including a handgun, shall not be delivered unless the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm presents a firearm safety certificate to the dealer, except that in the case of a handgun, an unexpired handgun safety certificate may be presented.

(f) A firearm shall not be delivered whenever the dealer is notified by the Department of Justice that within the preceding 30-day period, the purchaser has made another application to purchase a handgun, semiautomatic centerfire rifle, completed frame or receiver, or firearm precursor part, and that the previous application to purchase did not
 involve any of the entities or circumstances specified in subdivision (b) of Section 27535.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 17.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 18 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

27540.

A dealer, whether or not acting pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), shall not deliver a firearm to a person, as follows:

(a) Within 10 days of the application to purchase, or, after notice by the department pursuant to Section 28220, within 10 days of the submission to the department of any correction to the application, or within 10 days of the submission to the department of any fee required pursuant to Section 28225, whichever is later.

(b) Unless unloaded and securely wrapped or unloaded and in a locked container.

(c) Unless the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm presents clear evidence of
 the person’s identity and age to the dealer.

(d) Whenever the dealer is notified by the Department of Justice that the person is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(e) A firearm, including a handgun, shall not be delivered unless the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm presents a firearm safety certificate to the dealer, except that in the case of a handgun, an unexpired handgun safety certificate may be presented.

(f) A firearm shall not be delivered whenever the dealer is notified by the Department of Justice that the purchaser has made an application to purchase one or more firearms that would result in the purchase of more than three firearms cumulatively within the 30-day period preceding the date of the application, inclusive,
 including any handgun, semiautomatic centerfire rifle, completed frame or receiver, or firearm precursor part, and that the application or applications to purchase did not involve any of the entities or circumstances specified in subdivision (b) of Section 27535.

(g) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 18.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

27545.

Where neither party to the transaction holds a dealer’s license issued pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, the parties to the transaction shall complete the sale, loan, or transfer of that firearm through a licensed firearms dealer pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27550.

(a) No person may commit an act of collusion relating to Sections 31610 to 31700, inclusive.

(b) For purposes of this section and Section 26870, collusion may be proven by any one of the following factors:

(1) Answering a test applicant’s questions during an objective test relating to firearms safety.

(2) Knowingly grading the examination falsely.

(3) Providing an advance copy of the test to an applicant.

(4) Taking or allowing another
 person to take the basic firearms safety course for one who is the applicant for a basic firearms safety certificate or a handgun safety certificate.

(5) Allowing another to take the objective test for the applicant, purchaser, or transferee.

(6) Using or allowing another to use one’s identification, proof of residency, or thumbprint.

(7) Allowing others to give unauthorized assistance during the examination.

(8) Reference to unauthorized materials during the examination and cheating by the applicant.

(9) Providing originals or photocopies of the objective test, or any version thereof, to any person other than as authorized by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27555.

(a) (1) Commencing July 1, 2008, a person who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code may not sell, deliver, or transfer a firearm to a person in California who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code unless, prior to delivery, the person intending to sell, deliver, or transfer the firearm obtains a verification number via the Internet for the intended sale, delivery, or transfer, from the Department of Justice.

(2) If Internet service is unavailable to either the department or the licensee due to a technical or other malfunction, or a federal
 firearms licensee who is located outside of California does not possess a computer or have Internet access, alternate means of communication, including facsimile or telephone, shall be made available for a licensee to obtain a verification number in order to comply with this section.

(b) For every verification number request received pursuant to this section, the department shall determine whether the intended recipient is on the centralized list of firearms dealers pursuant to Section 26715, or the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees pursuant to Section 28450, or the centralized list of firearms manufacturers pursuant to Section 29060.

(c) (1) If the department finds after the reviews specified in subdivision (b) that the intended recipient is authorized to receive the firearm shipment, the department shall issue to the inquiring party, a
 unique verification number for the intended sale, delivery, or transfer. One verification number shall be issued for each sale, delivery, or transfer, which may involve multiple firearms.

(2) In addition to the unique verification number, the department may provide to the inquiring party information necessary for determining the eligibility of the intended recipient to receive the firearm.

(3) The person intending to sell, deliver, or transfer the firearm shall provide the unique verification number to the recipient along with the firearm upon delivery, in a manner to be determined by the department.

(d) If the department finds after the reviews specified in subdivision (b) that the intended recipient is not authorized to receive the firearm shipment, the department shall notify the inquiring party that the intended
 recipient is ineligible to receive the shipment.

(e) The department shall prescribe the manner in which the verification numbers may be requested via the Internet, or by alternate means of communication, such as by facsimile or telephone, including all required enrollment information and procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27560.

(a) (1) Within 60 days after bringing any firearm into this state, a personal firearm importer shall do one of the following:

(A) Submit to the Department of Justice,